New Jersey, session 221, S3385.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 35 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.40:55D-8.4) is amended to read as follows: 35.  a.  Beginning on the effective date of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.1 et al.), a fee is imposed on all construction resulting in non-residential development, as follows: (1)  A fee equal to two and one-half percent of the equalized assessed value of the land and improvements, for all new non-residential construction on an unimproved lot or lots; or (2)  A fee equal to two and one-half percent of the increase in equalized assessed value, of the additions to existing structures to be used for non-residential purposes. b.  All non-residential construction of buildings or structures on property used by churches, synagogues, mosques, and other houses of worship, and property used for educational purposes, which is tax-exempt pursuant to R.S.54:4-3.6, shall be exempt from the imposition of a non-residential development fee pursuant to this section, provided that the property continues to maintain its tax exempt status under that statute for a period of at least three years from the date of issuance of the certificate of occupancy.  In addition, the following shall be exempt from the imposition of a non-residential development fee: (1)  parking lots and parking structures, regardless of whether the parking lot or parking structure is constructed in conjunction with a non-residential development, such as an office building, or whether the parking lot is developed as an independent non-residential development; (2)  any non-residential development which is an amenity to be made available to the public, including, but not limited to, recreational facilities, community centers, and senior centers, which are developed in conjunction with or funded by a non-residential developer; (3)  non-residential construction resulting from a relocation of or an on-site improvement to a nonprofit hospital or a nursing home facility; (4)  projects that are located within a specifically delineated urban transit hub, as defined pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-208); (5)  projects that are located within an eligible municipality, as defined under section 2 of P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-208), when a majority of the project is located within a one-half mile radius of the midpoint of a platform area for a light rail system; and (6)  projects determined by the New Jersey Transit Corporation to be consistent with a transit village plan developed by a transit village designated by the Department of Transportation. A developer of a non-residential development exempted from the non-residential development fee pursuant to this section shall be subject to it at such time the basis for the exemption set forth in this subsection no longer applies, and shall make the payment of the non-residential development fee, in that event, within three years after that event or after the issuance of the final certificate of occupancy of the non-residential development whichever is later. For purposes of this subsection, "recreational facilities and community center" means any indoor or outdoor buildings, spaces, structures, or improvements intended for active or passive recreation, including but not limited to ball fields, meeting halls, and classrooms, accommodating either organized or informal activity; and "senior center" means any recreational facility or community center with activities and services oriented towards serving senior citizens. If a property which was exempted from the collection of a non-residential development fee thereafter ceases to be exempt from property taxation, the owner of the property shall remit the fees required pursuant to this section within 45 days of the termination of the property tax exemption.  Unpaid non-residential development fees under these circumstances may be enforceable by the municipality as a lien against the real property of the owner. c.  (1)  Unless authorized to pay directly to the municipality in which the non-residential construction is occurring in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection, developers shall pay non-residential development fees imposed pursuant to P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.1 et al.) to the Treasurer, in accordance with subsection g. of this section in a manner and on such forms as required by the Treasurer, provided that a certified proof concerning the payment shall be furnished by the Treasurer, to the municipality. (2)  The department shall maintain on its Internet website a list of each municipality that is authorized to use the development fees collected pursuant to this section and that has a confirmed status of compliance with the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), or is in the process of seeking compliance certification, which compliance shall include a spending plan pursuant to section 8 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.2) for all development fees collected. (3)  No later than [90] 180 days following the enactment of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.), any municipality that is or has been authorized to retain and expend non-residential development fees shall provide the department with a detailed accounting of all such fees that have been collected and expended since the inception of the municipal authorization to collect and retain said fees. (4)  Beginning with the year after the enactment of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.), by February 15, every municipality that is or has been authorized to retain and expend non-residential development fees shall provide the department with a detailed accounting of all such fees that have been collected and expended previous year. d.    The payment of non-residential development fees required pursuant to sections 32 through 38 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.40:55D-8.1 through C.40:55D-8.7) shall be made prior to the issuance of a certificate of occupancy for such development.  A final certificate of occupancy shall not be issued for any non-residential development until such time as the fee imposed pursuant to this section has been paid by the developer.  A non-residential developer may deposit with the appropriate entity the development fees as calculated by the municipality under protest, and the local code enforcement official shall thereafter issue the certificate of occupancy provided that the construction is otherwise eligible for a certificate of occupancy. e.     The construction official responsible for the issuance of a building permit shall notify the local tax assessor of the issuance of the first building permit for a development which may be subject to a non-residential development fee.  Within 90 days of receipt of that notice, the municipal tax assessor, based on the plans filed, shall provide an estimate of the equalized assessed value of the non-residential development.  The construction official responsible for the issuance of a final certificate of occupancy shall notify the local assessor of any and all requests for the scheduling of a final inspection on property which may be subject to a non-residential development fee.  Within 10 business days of a request for the scheduling of a final inspection, the municipal assessor shall confirm or modify the previously estimated equalized assessed value of the improvements of the non-residential development in accordance with the regulations adopted by the Treasurer pursuant to P.L.1971, c.424 (C.54:1-35.35); calculate the non-residential development fee pursuant to sections 32 through 38 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.40:55D-8.1 through C.40:55D-8.7); and thereafter notify the developer of the amount of the non-residential development fee.  Should the municipality fail to determine or notify the developer of the amount of the non-residential development fee within 10 business days of the request for final inspection, the developer may estimate the amount due and pay that estimated amount consistent with the dispute process set forth in subsection b. of section 37 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.40:55D-8.6).  Upon tender of the estimated non-residential development fee, provided the developer is in full compliance with all other applicable laws, the municipality shall issue a final certificate of occupancy for the subject property.  Failure of the municipality to comply with the timeframes or procedures set forth in this subsection may subject it to penalties to be imposed by the commissioner; any penalties so imposed shall be deposited into the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund" established pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1985, c.222 as amended by section 17 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-320). A developer of a mixed use development shall be required to pay the Statewide non-residential development fee relating to the non-residential development component of a mixed use development subject to the provisions of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.1 et al.). Non-residential construction which is connected with the relocation of the facilities of a for-profit hospital shall be subject to the fee authorized to be imposed under this section to the extent of the increase in equalized assessed valuation in accordance with regulations to be promulgated by the Director of the Division of Taxation, Department of the Treasury. f.     Any municipality that is not in compliance with the requirements established pursuant to sections 32 through 38 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.40:55D-8.1 through C.40:55D-8.7), or regulations of the commissioner adopted thereto, may be subject to forfeiture of any or all funds remaining within its municipal development trust fund.  Any funds so forfeited shall be deposited into the New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund established pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1985, c.222 as amended by section 17 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-320). g.    The Treasurer shall credit to the "Urban Housing Assistance Fund," established pursuant to section 13 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.7) annually from the receipts of the fees authorized to be imposed pursuant to this section an amount equal to $20 million; all receipts in excess of this amount shall be deposited into the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund," established pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1985, c.222 as amended by section 17 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-320), to be used for the purposes of that fund. The Treasurer shall adopt such regulations as necessary to effectuate sections 32 through 38 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.40:55D-8.1 through C.40:55D-8.7), in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2024, c.2, s.15) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately, and shall apply retroactively to authorize and validate the provision of a detailed accounting by any municipality, pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection c. of section 35 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.40:55D-8.4), that is provided to the Department of Community Affairs on or before 180 days following the enactment of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.).